Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 10.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5725
Proprietor, defined.

Proprietor means any employer, owner, operator, supervisor, manager, or other person who controls, governs, or directs the activities in a place of employment or public place.

Laws 2008, LB395, § 10.
June 1, 2009